Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4719
Officers and employees; fidelity bond or deposit.

(1) A prepaid limited health service organization shall maintain in force a fidelity bond in its own name on its officers and employees in an amount not less than fifty thousand dollars or in any other amount prescribed by the director. Except as otherwise provided by subsection (2) of this section, the bond shall be issued by an insurance company that is licensed to do business in this state, or if the fidelity bond required by this subsection is not available from an insurance company that holds a certificate of authority in this state, a fidelity bond procured by a surplus lines licensee resident in this state in compliance with section 44-5504 shall satisfy the requirements of this subsection.

(2) In lieu of the bond specified in subsection (1) of this section, a prepaid limited health service organization may deposit with the director fifty thousand dollars in cash or securities or other investments of the types set forth in section 44-4715. Such a deposit shall be maintained in joint custody with the director in the amount and subject to the same conditions required for a bond under this section.

Laws 1989, LB 320, § 19;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 54.